California statutes. Public Resources Code
The department is authorized to provide means of ingress to and egress from all state parks in order to provide ready access thereto by the public and to provide means of ingress and egress to highways and roads across state parks from lands separated from such highways and roads by state parks, and for that purpose may enter into contracts or agreements with cities, counties, and other political subdivisions of the State and with other state agencies or with persons, firms or corporations for the acquisition, construction, and maintenance of suitable roads, trails, and pathways.

When application is received by the department, other
 than under Section 5012, from any person, firm or corporation for right-of-way across a state park for ingress and egress to a highway or road from their lands separated from such highway or road by the state park, the department shall determine whether any reasonable access exists outside the boundaries of the park, or could be economically constructed. Where reasonable access does not exist or cannot be economically constructed outside the boundaries of the park, the department shall grant a permit for right-of-way across the park over such route and subject to such conditions and construction and maintenance specifications as the department may determine which will cause minimum alteration to the physical features of the park and minimum interference with the use of the park by the public. The permittee shall at his own expense construct and maintain the means of ingress and egress in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the permit, noncompliance with which in any part shall be due cause
 for revocation of such permit. The department may require a permittee or permittees to allow the use of such means of ingress and egress by any other applicant whose lands are similarly situated. The department shall grant a permit for such use under terms and conditions imposed upon existing users, upon payment of a reasonable compensation for construction and maintenance of the road, by the applicant to the existing permittee, or permittees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.6.

The planning, design, and construction of a boating facility within the state park system shall be the responsibility of the Division of Boating and Waterways within the department pursuant to Section 50 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   (AB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.6.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the department may negotiate a service contract with an entity qualified to do business in the state as a ferry operator, for the transport of passengers via ferry service between the City of Tiburon and Angel Island State Park. The terms of the service contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Public ferry service seven days a week, at least 362 days of the year unless otherwise agreed to by the department.

(2) Public ferry service of at least three round trips per day unless otherwise agreed to by the department.

(3) A contract term of up to 10 years, with the option of term extensions for a total contract term of up to 20 years.

(b) The terms of the service contract may provide, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) The retention by the contractor of a portion of any fees, rent, or other return collected by the contractor as reimbursement for the cost of collection.

(2) Payment or credit by the department to the contractor of a flat fee for each public ferry trip or if a certain agreed upon percentage of ridership is not met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 37.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.7.

(a) For due, owing, and unpaid charges or fees for water, sewage, gas, electricity, garbage, or other utility services furnished by the Department of Parks and Recreation or the Department of General Services to real property, the department shall have a lien on that real property upon filing a notice of lien with the county recorder.

(b) The notice of lien shall contain all of the following:

(1) A description of the subject real property.

(2) The total amount of the lien.

(3) The type of service furnished.

(4) The period during which service was furnished, the amount owing for the period of service, and the date upon which the amount became due.

(5) A verified statement that notice of the delinquent charges or fees was mailed, postage prepaid, to the owner of record, to any other known owner, and to the person in possession of the subject real property at their last known address at least 30 days prior to the filing of the notice of lien with the county recorder.

(c) The lien shall not extend to delinquent charges or fees incurred more than four years prior to the filing of the notice of lien. The lien shall, except as provided in subdivision (e), continue in effect for four
 years after the filing of the notice of lien, unless sooner extinguished by payment, satisfaction, or merger in judgment of foreclosure.

(d) Within four years after the notice of lien is filed of record, an action to foreclose the lien may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, be brought in the name of the people in any court having jurisdiction to hear and dispose of actions to foreclose mechanics’ liens for like amounts. If the action is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction in Sacramento County, the court is the proper court for trial, without regard to the residence of the defendants.

(e) Upon recording of lis pendens, the notice of lien shall continue in effect until the recording of the abstract of judgment thereon, unless the lien be otherwise extinguished, but not in any event in excess of 10 years from the date of recording of the notice of lien. The lien
 of abstract shall take priority from the date of recordation of the notice of lien.

(f) The Director of Parks and Recreation or the Director of General Services, as the case may be, or the Attorney General may execute and file those notices, releases, and satisfaction, as may be necessary or convenient in carrying out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), the director, the department, or the State Park and Recreation Commission shall not adopt nor publish a building standard, as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code, unless Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section
 has no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from those provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5003.2 (as added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.10.

(a) The department may convey, in trust for the development, improvement, operation, and maintenance of trails, to the County of San Mateo, for administration through its parks and recreation department, all rights, title, and interest held or owned by the state, including easements and rights-of-way, in real property located in the County of San Mateo between La Honda Road (Route 84) and Route 280, consisting of seven segments of land within the California Hiking and Riding Trail, as follows:

(1) Tract #4, book 3890, page 616, file #7250-T, recorded 11/15/60.

(2) Tract #9, book 1903, page 486, file #73287-I, recorded 7/21/50.

(3) Tract #10, book 2648, page 547, file #85234-L, recorded 9/13/54.

(4) Tract #11, book 1969, page 55, file #96904-I, recorded 11/02/50.

(5) Tract #11A, book 2495, page 463, file #17524-L, recorded 11/05/53.

(6) Tract #12, book 1995, page 5, file #6416-J, recorded 12/19/50.

(7) Tract #14, book 1904, page 667, file #73783-I, recorded 7/22/50.

(8) Tract #15, book 2023,
 page 658, file #17905-J, recorded 2/16/51.

(9) Tract #38, including a section of the trail that crosses Skyline Boulevard and proceeds adjacent to the eastern right-of-way line to Westborough Boulevard, where it again crosses Skyline Boulevard and extends west to Malagra Ridge, and that was acquired pursuant to a letter of permission issued by the State of California that was secured on 2/11/60.

(b) The County of San Mateo may develop, improve, operate, and maintain the real property conveyed pursuant to subdivision (a) as a part of the county’s trail system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.11.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000) of Title 2 of the Government Code that relate to the disposition of state-owned real property, the director may grant to the City of Malibu, subject to the conditions set forth in this section, all of the rights, title, and interest of the state in an approximately 10.81-acre portion of the Malibu Bluffs unit of Malibu Lagoon State Beach, known as Malibu Bluffs Community Park, in the County of Los Angeles.

(b) The grant is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The real property conveyed shall be operated, maintained, and improved by the City of Malibu for park purposes in perpetuity, consistent with any covenants, conditions, and restrictions in the deed transferring the property.

(2) The City of Malibu shall pay the department fair market value for the real property conveyed and as restricted by paragraph (1). The fair market value shall be determined by an appraisal that is reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services.

(3) The net proceeds from the transfer shall be deposited pursuant to Section 5003.15, with Attorney General review and approval.

(c) The Legislature
 finds and declares that the transfer to the City of Malibu of the real property described in subdivision (a) and subject to the conditions specified in subdivision (b) is excepted from the provisions of Section 5096.516 in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.516.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 77, Sec. 47.   Effective July 18, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.12.

The department may convey, in trust for the development, improvement, operation, and maintenance of trails, to the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District all rights, title, and interest held or owned by the state, including easements and rights-of-way, in real property located in the County of San Mateo to the west of, and parallel to, Skyline Boulevard (Route 35) between Allen Road and Spanish Creek Road, south of La Honda Road (Route 84), consisting of five segments of land within the California Hiking and Riding Trail, as follows:

(a) Tract #17B, book 2518, page 221, file #27499, recorded 12/05/53.

(b) Tract #18A, book 2509, page 42, file #23256-L, recorded 12/07/53.

(c) Tract #19, book 2507, page 118, file #22328-L, recorded 12/02/53.

(d) Tract #19A, book 3064, page 526, file #73082-H, recorded 7/24/56.

(e) Tract #19B, book 2495, page 466, file #17525-L, recorded 11/05/53.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.13.

(a) The director may grant, in trust, an easement, subject to an agreement reached between the department and the County of Santa Cruz, of 420 feet of Aptos Creek Road as it extends northward from Soquel Drive to the County of Santa Cruz for county road purposes, if those uses include access for beach, park, and recreational purposes.

(b) The County of Santa Cruz shall use and maintain any lands, and any improvements thereon, that are granted to the county pursuant to
 subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.14.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may grant, in trust and subject to the conditions set forth in this section, all of the rights, title, and interest of the State of California in all lands located within the boundaries of the Oxnard State Beach to the City of Oxnard in Ventura County.

(b)(1) The grant made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not affect the use or preservation of the beach lands, including the preservation of the primary dune system
 within the boundaries of the beach lands.

(2) The grant shall be made upon the following express conditions:

(A) The City of Oxnard shall use and maintain the beach lands, and any improvements thereon, that are conveyed in the deed, for public beach purposes.

(B) Any improvements that are constructed or placed on the beach lands after the date that the grant is made shall conform to the Oxnard State Beach General Plan that was adopted pursuant to Section 5002.2.

(3) Upon a breach by the City of Oxnard, or its successors or assigns, of any of the conditions upon which the grant is made, as set forth in paragraph (2), all of the rights, title, and interest of the City of Oxnard in the beach lands and improvements thereon shall be terminated pursuant to
 the procedures prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 885.010) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, and all rights, title, and interest in the beach lands and improvements thereon shall revert to, and rest in, the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.15.

The net proceeds of any sale made on behalf of the department pursuant to Section 11011 of the Government Code of any real property originally acquired for state park purposes, regardless of whether that real property is under the jurisdiction of the department, shall be deposited in the fund which was the original source for the acquisition of the property and shall be available for appropriation for the further extension, improvement, or development of the state park system in accordance with the law governing that fund. If the fund of origin is not in
 existence, or if the original source for the acquisition was funds from the federal government for park purposes or a donation of real property, the net proceeds shall be deposited in the State Parks and Recreation Fund and shall be available for appropriation for the further extension, improvement, or development of the state park system. If the real property was originally acquired with moneys appropriated from the General Fund, the net proceeds shall be deposited in the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.

This section does not apply to the sale of any real property in the state vehicular recreation areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.16.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, and notwithstanding the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000) of Title 2 of the Government Code that relate to the disposition of state-owned real property, with the approval of the Director of General Services, the director may exchange with or sell to the City of Sacramento for fair market value all or part of the following described property located in Old Sacramento State Historic Park that is part of the Old Sacramento Historic District in the City of Sacramento:

(1) PARCEL 1: APN 009-0012-048 (Docks).

(2) PARCEL 2: APN 009-0012-058 (Docks).

(3) PARCEL 3: APN 009-0012-059 (Docks).

(4) PARCEL 4: APN 002-0010-023 (Railyards Riverfront).

(b) For the purpose of complying with the fair market value requirement of subdivision (a), the City of Sacramento shall be credited for any financial participation it contributes either toward a purchase by the state of a real property interest that benefits Old Sacramento State Historic Park, or in a development project by the state that benefits Old Sacramento State Historic Park, or both. For the purpose of this subdivision, any purchase by the state shall be made at fair market value, and any development by the
 state shall be valued at fair market value.

(c) The transfer authorized in subdivision (a) shall require that the fair market value include consideration for any toxic remediation that needs to be performed on the parcels.

(d) Proceeds from the transfer authorized in subdivision (a) shall be used to finance the department’s costs for negotiating the transfer and transferring the property.

(e) Any net proceeds from the transfer authorized in subdivision (a) shall be deposited into the State Park Contingent Fund to be used for development or construction within Old Sacramento State Historic Park.

(f) Before authorizing an exchange, sale, or transfer, the director shall secure an independent market valuation of the property authorized for
 transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.17.

(a) The department may lease, for any use, all or any portion of any parcel of real property acquired for state park system purposes, if the director finds that the use would be compatible with the use of the real property as a unit or part of a unit and with the sound management and conservation of resources within the unit.

(b) Rent shall be based on the fair market value of the property when used for the purpose for which it is leased. All rent shall be deposited pursuant to Section 5010.

(c) The lease term shall not exceed 10 years. All leases are subject to the approval of the Department of General Services,
 unless the approval is waived by the department.

(d) A lease shall not be entered into that extends beyond the 10-year period unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) At least 30 days’ prior written notice of the proposed lease, including a copy of the proposed lease, has been provided by the director to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(2) The director has included with the proposed lease sufficient documentation to enable the Joint Legislative Budget Committee to determine whether the lease conforms to the requirements of this article and to evaluate fully all terms upon which the lease is proposed to be let, including the amount of the rent and other revenues that may be generated under the
 lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 5.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.18.

(a) The director may lease to the City of Los Angeles a parcel, not to exceed 20 acres of unimproved real property situated in the City of Los Angeles, that parcel being a portion of the property owned by the department and commonly known as Taylor Yard.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5003.17, the term of the lease shall be for a period not to exceed 25 years and shall be without monetary consideration for use of the property, except that the city shall
 fund the development and operation of the park. The terms of the lease shall specify the nature of the city’s control of, and responsibility for the operation of, the parcel.

(c) The purpose of the lease shall be for the development and operation by the city of a local park with regional benefits containing and providing organized sports facilities that will primarily serve the youth of the Los Angeles region.

(d) If the department determines that the city has failed to develop a local park with regional benefits containing and providing organized sports facilities within five years of execution of the lease, the state shall have the right to terminate the lease.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 5003.17, the Public Works Board shall review and approve the lease, and shall report any action taken to the
 Legislature and the Governor.

(f) Upon one year’s written notice from the city and upon the state’s written consent as granted pursuant to the state’s sole discretion, the lease may be extended for an additional 25 years commencing on the first calendar day after the date set for expiration of the lease. In exercising its discretion to extend the term of the lease, the state may modify, add, or delete terms and conditions of the lease, including a requirement for monetary consideration for use of the property, as the state may determine to be in the best interest of the state. Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5003.17, the Legislature shall review and approve any extension of the lease.

(g) The lease, and any extension of the lease, pursuant to this section shall require the city to comply with applicable stormwater waste discharge requirements issued by the Los Angeles
 Regional Water Quality Control Board and the State Water Resources Control Board.

(h) The City of Los Angeles may not use the lease as its match when applying for grant funds under the Roberti-Z’Berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620)), or any other state grant funds, to develop Taylor Yard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.19.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000) of Title 2 of the Government Code that relate to the disposition of state-owned real property, the director may grant to the City of Santa Cruz, subject to the conditions set forth in this section, all of the rights, title, and interest of the state in approximately 37.6 acres, known as Lighthouse Field State Beach, in the County of Santa Cruz.

(b) The grant is subject to all of the following
 conditions:

(1) The real property conveyed shall be operated, maintained, and improved by the City of Santa Cruz for park purposes in perpetuity, consistent with any covenants, conditions, and restrictions in the deed transferring the property.

(2) The City of Santa Cruz shall pay the department fair market value, in accordance with mutually agreed upon terms, for the real property conveyed and as restricted by paragraph (1). The fair market value shall be determined by an appraisal that is reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services.

(3) The net proceeds from the transfer shall be deposited pursuant to Section 5003.15, with Attorney General review and approval.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the transfer to the City of
 Santa Cruz of the real property described in subdivision (a) and subject to the conditions specified in subdivision (b) is excepted from the provisions of Section 5096.516 in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.516.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 178, Sec. 11.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

The department shall gather, digest, and summarize, in its annual reports to the Governor, information concerning the State Park System and the relation to it of other available means for conserving, developing, and utilizing the scenic and recreational resources of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.5.

(a) The California Youth Soccer and Recreation Development Program is hereby created in the department. The department shall administer the program, which is intended to provide assistance to local agencies and community-based organizations with regard to funding, and fostering the development of, new youth soccer, baseball, softball, and basketball recreation opportunities in the state.

(b) The California Youth Soccer and Recreation Development Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, to be used as a repository of funds derived from federal, state, and private sources to be used for the program.

(c) The department shall award grants, on a competitive basis, to local agencies and community-based organizations for the purposes of the program, subject to an appropriation therefor. The department shall also develop eligibility guidelines for the award of grants that give preference to those communities that provide matching funds for grants, and that are heavily populated, low-income urban areas with a high youth crime and unemployment rate. The guidelines shall also require that preference be given to those inner city properties that may be leased for periods of at least five years or more for recreational purposes. The department shall conduct public hearings
 throughout the state prior to final adoption of eligibility guidelines.

(d) Any regulation, guideline, or procedural guide adopted or developed pursuant to this section is not subject to the review or approval of the Office of Administrative Law or to any other requirement of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Community-based organization” means an organization that enters into a cooperative agreement with the department pursuant to Section 513, a nonprofit group or organization, or a friends of parks group or organization of a city, county, city and county, and regional park. All community-based organizations shall have a current tax-exempt status as a nonprofit
 organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(2) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, park and recreation district, open-space district, or school district.

(f) This section shall be implemented only upon appropriation of sufficient funds to the department for that purpose.

(g) All funds received by the department pursuant to this section shall be encumbered within three years of the date of the appropriation and expended within eight years from the date of the appropriation.

(h) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit community-based organizations from acting in partnership with organizations that do not have tax-exempt status as a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal
 Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 139.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

(a) The department may receive and accept in the name of the people of the state any gift, dedication, devise, grant, or other conveyance of title to or any interest in real property, including water rights, roads, trails, rights-of-way, buildings, facilities, and other improvements, to be added to or used in connection with the state park system. It may receive and accept gifts, donations, contributions, or
 bequests of money to be used in acquiring title to or any interest in real property, or in improving it as a part of or in connection with the state park system, or to be used for any of the purposes for which the department is created. It may also receive and accept personal property for any purpose connected with the park system.

(b) Subdivision (a) is subject to the requirements and exceptions set forth in Section 11005 of the Government Code, except that conditional gifts or bequests of money valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, shall not require the approval of the Director of Finance.

(c) The department shall annually report to the Department of Finance all conditional gifts or bequests of money valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less that it accepts and receives pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 559, Sec. 3.   (AB 549)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.01.

(a) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall, after consultation with appropriate Native American groups, receive and accept a donation of Indian artifacts found in the vicinity of the Los Encinos State Historic Park. The donation shall consist of a representative sample of artifacts determined by the department to be of historic or cultural interest to the residents of the San Fernando Valley.

(b) The department shall, after consultation with appropriate Native American groups, house and display the donated artifacts at the Los Encinos
 State Historic Park.

(c) Artifacts not received and accepted pursuant to subdivision (a) may be donated to colleges, universities, museums, appropriate Native American groups, or nonprofit organizations in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   Effective June 18, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.1.

The Department of Parks and Recreation may with approval of the Department of General Services transfer, sell or otherwise dispose of personal property under its jurisdiction and may contract with other public agencies for its custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.3.

The department shall identify a site on its lands at the head of Bodega Bay, which shall be mutually agreed upon by the department and the Board of Directors of the Pacific Coast Federation of Fishermen’s Association, for the Bodega Bay Fisherman’s Memorial. The memorial shall be constructed and maintained solely through private contributions of funds, materials, and labor. The department shall be responsible for the interpretation, in consultation with the Pacific Coast Federation of Fishermen’s Association, of the memorial after its completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.6.

The department has exclusive jurisdiction with respect to property salvage and recovery operations in and upon the lands of the state park system. The department may grant the privilege of conducting salvage and recovery operations in and upon those lands by the issuance of permits. The director may adopt rules and regulations in connection with applications for the permits and the operations to be conducted thereunder, as he or she deems necessary to protect the state park system and the interests of the public in the recovered property. The regulations may
 include, but may not be limited to, regulations on the percentage of recovered property to be retained by the state, authorization for retention by the state of any items of historical, cultural, or other value, authorized methods, and recordkeeping requirements for conduct of salvage operations.

The terms and conditions of any permit issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to the approval of the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 953, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

(a) The department, with the consent of the Department of Finance, and subject to Section 15853 of the Government Code, may acquire title to or any interest in real property, including personal property incidental to the purchase of real property and options to purchase property, which the department deems necessary or proper for the extension, improvement, or development of the state park system. All real and personal property acquired by the department for the state park system shall be under the jurisdiction of the department immediately upon transfer of title to the state.

(b) (1) The department, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15853
 of the Government Code, may appraise and select real property for the purpose of acquiring an option to purchase the real property for the state park system. The department may use the services of the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services or may contract with independent appraisers appropriately certified by the Office of Real Estate Appraisers, to assist in appraising property.

(2) The department, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15853 of the Government Code, may appraise and select real property for potential acquisition of, and addition to, the state park system. The department may use the services of the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services or may contract with independent appraisers appropriately certified by the Office of Real Estate Appraisers,
 to assist in appraising the property. Before appraising the property, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall notify the owners of the real property that the department is considering the real property for acquisition, and may have it appraised. The department shall determine the form and manner of giving the notice.

(3) The department, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15853 of the Government Code, may select real property it has appraised and submit purchase offers and negotiate a purchase agreement with the owner or owners of the property. The department shall be responsible for implementing and processing the purchase agreement and conveyance of title to the state. The department may use the services of the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services, or may contract with other state
 agencies with real estate and right-of-way acquisition programs, to assist in negotiating purchase agreements and conveyance of title.

(c) Upon acquisition of real property for the state park system, the department shall be responsible for providing relocation assistance to displaced persons as provided under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The department may use the services of the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services, or may contract with other state agencies or private consultants with real estate and right-of-way acquisition programs, to assist in relocation planning and implementation.

(d) (1) Requests for funding to administer the department’s acquisition program
 shall be submitted by the department for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget for each fiscal year.

(2) Requests for funding to acquire options to purchase real and personal property for the state park system shall be submitted by the department for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget for each fiscal year based upon its estimate of the amount needed for that purpose. If an option to purchase real property for the state park system has been acquired, the funding proposed by the department shall be the appraised value of the property less the sum expended for the purchase of the option. The expenditure of the moneys shall be subject to the limitation specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15853 of the Government Code unless otherwise provided by the Legislature.

(3) Requests for funding to acquire real property or any interest in real property shall be submitted by the department for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget for each fiscal year. The projects shall have been selected and appraised by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) before inclusion. The Governor’s Budget shall contain a separate description of each project, or acquisition program and its appraised value, or funding allocation.

(e) The requirements imposed by subdivision (d) are in addition to any other law requiring the inclusion of state park system acquisition projects in the Governor’s Budget.

(f) The department shall not enter into a purchase agreement for the acquisition of real property if the consideration to be paid by the department is in excess of five
 hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), unless Section 5006.1 has been complied with.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, all appraisals conducted by the department pursuant to this section shall be reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services or, at the discretion of the Department of General Services, a competent professional appraiser approved by the Department of General Services. Real property shall be appraised and appraisal review completed before commencement of purchasing negotiations. All contracts related to the acquisition of real property are subject to Section 11005 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Department of General Services may waive its review and approval of any appraisal conducted by the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 6.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.1.

(a) (1) Before submitting a proposal pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5006, for an appropriation for the acquisition of real property in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in value for any state park system project, the department shall hold a public meeting within the county in which the proposed
 project is located at which interested members of the public may comment on the proposed project. Notice of the meeting shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within that county.

(2) (A) The department shall provide written notice of its intent to acquire the real property to the city or county, or both, having jurisdiction over the property, to the members of the Legislature who are the Chair and
 Vice Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the chair of the budget subcommittee in each house having jurisdiction over resources, the chair in each house of the appropriate legislative policy committee, and the legislators within whose district the property proposed for acquisition is located, as early as possible in the acquisition process, but not less than 90 days from the date of acquisition. Within 30 days of receiving written notice of the proposed acquisition, a member of the city council or board of supervisors of the respective city or county, or a Member of the Legislature who has been notified pursuant to this subparagraph, may request that the department hold a public
 meeting regarding the acquisition of the property, if the acquisition is between five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(B) The written notice of intent shall describe any potential impact that the acquisition may have on the department’s efforts to provide park and recreational opportunities.

(b) With respect to real property in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) that is not proposed to be acquired pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5006, the department shall hold a public meeting within the county in which the real property is located, at which interested members of the public may
 comment on the proposed acquisition. Notice of the meeting shall be published at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The department shall provide written notice of its intent to acquire the real property to the city or county, or both, having jurisdiction over the property, as early as possible in the acquisition process.

(c) (1) With respect to real property acquired pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 15853 of, and paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 11005 of, the Government Code, the department shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide written notice to the county board of supervisors for the county in which the land is located of the intent to acquire the real property.
